Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1526
Bonds; interest; exempt from taxation.

In issuing revenue bonds pursuant to section 85-1515 or sections 85-1520 to 85-1527, the board issuing such bonds shall be a governmental subdivision and instrumentality of the State of Nebraska and all bonds issued under the authority of such sections, together with interest on such bonds, shall be wholly exempt from taxation.

Laws 1987, LB 329, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-2650.14;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 48.